Utah statutes.
13-45-301.   Protection of personal information.
(1)  Except as allowed by other law, a person may not display a Social
Security number in a manner or location that is likely to be open to public
view.
(2)  The state, or a branch, agency, or political subdivision of the state,
may not employ or contract for the employment of an inmate in any Department
of Corrections facility or county jail in any capacity that would allow any
inmate access to any other person's personal information.
